Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201785-2427
Reference to Guaranty Recovery Cash Fund authorized.

A for-profit postsecondary institution may include references to the Guaranty Recovery Cash Fund in advertising or information provided to students or prospective students. Any such reference shall clearly describe the protection and limitations prescribed in section 85-2426 and the relevant rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

Laws 2017, LB512, § 36.
September 1, 2017